Utah statutes.
53A-17a-167.   Early Intervention Program.

(1)  The State Board of Education shall distribute funds appropriated under this section, consistent with guidelines in this section, to school districts and charter schools that apply for the funds.

(2)  A school district or charter school shall use funds appropriated in this section to offer an early intervention program, delivered through an enhanced kindergarten program that:

(a)  is an academic program focused on building age-appropriate literacy and numeracy skills;

(b)  uses an evidence-based early intervention model;

(c)  is targeted to at-risk students; and

(d)  is delivered through additional hours or other means.

(3)  A school district or charter school may not require a student to participate in an enhanced kindergarten program described in Subsection (2).

(4)  The State Board of Education shall distribute funds appropriated under this section to school districts and charter schools based on the number of kindergarten students eligible to receive free or reduced price school lunch in each school district or charter school that applies for funding under Subsection (1).

(5)  In addition to an enhanced kindergarten program described in Subsection (2), the early intervention program includes a component to address early intervention through the use of an interactive computer software program.

(6)  The State Board of Education shall select one or more technology providers, through a request for proposals process, to provide an interactive computer software program for literacy or numeracy instruction, or both, and assessments for students in kindergarten and grade 1.

(7)  On or before November 1, 2013, and every year thereafter, the State Board of Education shall report final testing data regarding an interactive computer software program described in Subsection (6), including student learning gains as a result of the interactive computer software program, to:

(a)  the Education Interim Committee; and

(b)  the governor.

